North Carolina, session 2025, HB14.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-153.5(a)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Deduction Amount. – In calculating North Carolina taxable income, a taxpayer may
deduct from adjusted gross income either the standard deduction amount provided in subdivision
(1) of this subsection or the itemized deduction amount provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection. The deduction amounts are as follows:
…
(2) Itemized deduction amount. – An amount equal to the sum of the items listed
in this subdivision. The amounts allowed under this subdivision are not
subject to the overall limitation on itemized deductions under section 68 of
the Code:
…
e. The amount allowed as a deduction for wagering losses under section
165(d) of the Code, to the extent the losses are not deducted in arriving
at adjusted gross income."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2024.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 105-153.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.5. Modifications to adjusted gross income.
…
(b) Other Deductions. – In calculating North Carolina taxable income, a taxpayer may
deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted gross income any of the following items that are included in
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income:
…
(17) Gain or loss, to the extent the loss is not deducted in arriving at adjusted gross
income, from the disposition of investment coins and investment metal
bullion. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:
a. Investment coins. – Numismatic coins or other forms of money and
legal tender manufactured of metal under the laws of the United States
or any foreign nation with a fair market value greater than any
statutory or nominal value of such coins.
b. Investment metal bullion. – Any elementary precious metal that has
been put through a process of smelting or refining and that is in such
*H14-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
state or condition that its value depends upon its content and not upon
its form. The term does not include fabricated precious metal that has
been processed or manufactured for one or more specific and
customary industrial, professional, or artistic uses.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.(a) Article 13 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 66-67.6. Commerce of investment coins and investment metal bullion.
(a) Legal Tender. – Investment coins and investment metal bullion (i) as defined in
G.S. 105-153.5(b)(17), (ii) made of refined gold or silver, and (iii) stamped, marked, or imprinted
with its weight and purity shall be recognized as legal tender in the State.
(b) Commerce. – No person is required to offer or accept any recognized legal tender as
described in subsection (a) of this section for payment of debts, deposit, or any other purpose. In
addition, no person incurs liability for refusing to offer or accept such legal tender, except as
specifically provided for by contract or otherwise required by law."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 14-Second Edition